Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Housing and Community  Services Department, for the biennium beginning July
1, 2017, out of the General Fund, the amount of $150,000, for deposit into the Wildfire Damage
Housing Relief Account for use as provided under ORS 458.667.
SECTION 2. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Passed by House July 5, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 2741 (HB 2741-A) Page 1